North Carolina, session 2025, HB346.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-5(o) and any State Board of Community
Colleges policy to the contrary, the State Board of Community Colleges shall calculate the budget
full-time equivalent (FTE) enrolled at the Harnett Main Campus for the purposes of multicampus
center status by combining the total number of FTE at the Harnett Main Campus with the total
number of FTE at the Harnett Health Sciences Center.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 115D-5(o) and any State Board of Community
Colleges policy to the contrary, the State Board of Community Colleges shall calculate the budget
full-time equivalent (FTE) enrolled at the Chatham Main Campus for the purposes of
multicampus center status by combining the total number of FTE at the Chatham Main Campus
with the total number of FTE at the Chatham Health Sciences Center.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H346-v-2*